Illinois, session 104th, SB102.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by adding 5Article 85 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/Art. 85 heading new)7ARTICLE 85. NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT 8    (225 ILCS 65/85-5 new)9    Sec. 85-5. Nurse Licensure Compact. The State of Illinois 10ratifies and approves the following Compact: 11ARTICLE I 12Findings and Declaration of Purpose 13    a. The party states find that:14        1. The health and safety of the public are affected by 15    the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of 16    enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure 17    laws;18        2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws 19    regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or 20    harm to the public;  SB0102- 2 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        3. The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of 2    advanced communication technologies as part of our 3    nation's health care delivery system require greater 4    coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of 5    nurse licensure and regulation;6        4. New practice modalities and technology make 7    compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws 8    difficult and complex;9        5. The current system of duplicative licensure for 10    nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and 11    redundant for both nurses and states; and12        6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements 13    throughout the states promotes public safety and public 14    health benefits. 15    b. The general purposes of this Compact are to: 16        1. Facilitate the states' responsibility to protect 17    the public's health and safety;18        2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party 19    states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;20        3. Facilitate the exchange of information between 21    party states in the areas of nurse regulation, 22    investigation and adverse actions;23        4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the 24    practice of nursing in each jurisdiction;25        5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold 26    a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in   SB0102- 3 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    the state in which the patient is located at the time care 2    is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state 3    licenses; 4        6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and 5    issuance of nurse licenses; and6        7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by 7    nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements.  8ARTICLE II 9Definitions 10    As used in this Compact:11        a. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, 12    equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws 13    which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority 14    against a nurse, including actions against an individual's 15    license or multistate licensure privilege such as 16    revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the 17    licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any 18    other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's 19    authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease 20    and desist action.21        b. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary 22    monitoring program approved by a licensing board.23        c. "Coordinated licensure information system" means an 24    integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing   SB0102- 4 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities 2    related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a 3    nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by 4    licensing boards.5        d. "Current significant investigative information" 6    means:7            1. Investigative information that a licensing 8        board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes 9        notification and an opportunity for the nurse to 10        respond, if required by state law, has reason to 11        believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would 12        indicate more than a minor infraction; or13            2. Investigative information that indicates that 14        the nurse represents an immediate threat to public 15        health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has 16        been notified and had an opportunity to respond.17        e. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, 18    or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice 19    of nursing imposed by a licensing board.20        f. "Home state" means the party state which is the 21    nurse's primary state of residence.22        g. "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory 23    body responsible for issuing nurse licenses.24        h. "Multistate license" means a license to practice as 25    a registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse 26    (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that   SB0102- 5 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party 2    states under a multistate licensure privilege.3        i. "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal 4    authorization associated with a multistate license 5    permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered 6    nurse (RN) or LPN/VN in a remote state.7        j. "Nurse" means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are 8    defined by each party state's practice laws.9        k. "Party state" means any state that has adopted this 10    Compact.11        l. "Remote state" means a party state, other than the 12    home state.13        m. "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued 14    by a party state that authorizes practice only within the 15    issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure 16    privilege to practice in any other party state.17        n. "State" means a state, territory or possession of 18    the United States and the District of Columbia.19        o. "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, 20    rules and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, 21    define the scope of nursing practice, and create the 22    methods and grounds for imposing discipline. "State 23    practice laws" do not include requirements necessary to 24    obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or 25    requirements of the home state.    SB0102- 6 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1ARTICLE III 2General Provisions and Jurisdiction 3    a. A multistate license to practice registered or licensed 4practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a 5resident in that state will be recognized by each party state 6as authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) 7or as a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a 8multistate licensure privilege, in each party state.9    b. A state must implement procedures for considering the 10criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate 11license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall 12include the submission of fingerprints or other 13biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of 14obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information 15from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency 16responsible for retaining that state's criminal records.17    c. Each party state shall require the following for an 18applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home 19state:20        1. Meets the home state's qualifications for licensure 21    or renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable 22    state laws;23        2. i. Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a 24    licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure 25    education program; or  SB0102- 7 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        ii. Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN 2    prelicensure education program that (a) has been approved 3    by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable 4    country and (b) has been verified by an independent 5    credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing 6    board-approved prelicensure education program;7        3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure 8    education program not taught in English or if English is 9    not the individual's native language, successfully passed 10    an English proficiency examination that includes the 11    components of reading, speaking, writing and listening;12        4. Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN® or NCLEX-PN® 13    Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable;14        5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered 15    license;16        6. Has submitted, in connection with an application 17    for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, 18    fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of 19    obtaining criminal history record information from the 20    Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible 21    for retaining that state's criminal records;22        7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has 23    entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense 24    under applicable state or federal criminal law;25        8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has 26    entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor   SB0102- 8 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    offense related to the practice of nursing as determined 2    on a case-by-case basis;3        9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative 4    program;5        10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements 6    regarding current participation in an alternative program; 7    and8        11. Has a valid United States Social Security number.9    d. All party states shall be authorized, in accordance 10with existing state due process law, to take adverse action 11against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as 12revocation, suspension, probation or any other action that 13affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate 14licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a 15party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the 16administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. 17The administrator of the coordinated licensure information 18system shall promptly notify the home state of any such 19actions by remote states.20    e. A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the 21state practice laws of the state in which the client is located 22at the time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not 23limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing 24practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party 25state in which the client is located. The practice of nursing 26in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will   SB0102- 9 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, 2the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client 3is located at the time service is provided.4    f. Individuals not residing in a party state shall 5continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state 6license as provided under the laws of each party state. 7However, the single-state license granted to these individuals 8will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice 9nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact 10shall affect the requirements established by a party state for 11the issuance of a single-state license.12    g. Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on 13the effective date of this Compact, may retain and renew the 14multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home 15state, provided that:16        1. A nurse, who changes primary state of residence 17    after this Compact's effective date, must meet all 18    applicable Article III.c. requirements to obtain a 19    multistate license from a new home state.20        2. A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate 21    licensure requirements in Article III.c. due to a 22    disqualifying event occurring after this Compact's 23    effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a 24    multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license 25    shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with 26    applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of   SB0102- 10 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators ("Commission").  2ARTICLE IV 3Applications for Licensure in a Party State 4    a. Upon application for a multistate license, the 5licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, 6through the coordinated licensure information system, whether 7the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license 8issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances 9on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the 10applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against 11any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the 12applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating 13in an alternative program.14    b. A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the 15home state, in only one party state at a time.16    c. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving 17between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure 18in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the 19prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with 20applicable rules adopted by the Commission.21        1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a 22    change in primary state of residence.23        2. A multistate license shall not be issued by the new 24    home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence   SB0102- 11 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    of a change in primary state of residence to the new home 2    state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain 3    a multistate license from the new home state.4    d. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving 5from a party state to a non-party state, the multistate 6license issued by the prior home state will convert to a 7single-state license, valid only in the former home state.  8ARTICLE V 9Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing 10Boards 11    a. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, 12a licensing board shall have the authority to: 13        1. Take adverse action against a nurse's multistate 14    licensure privilege to practice within that party state.15            i. Only the home state shall have the power to take 16        adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the 17        home state.18            ii. For purposes of taking adverse action, the 19        home state licensing board shall give the same 20        priority and effect to reported conduct received from 21        a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred 22        within the home state. In so doing, the home state 23        shall apply its own state laws to determine 24        appropriate action.  SB0102- 12 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an 2    encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that 3    party state.4        3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who 5    changes primary state of residence during the course of 6    such investigations. The licensing board shall also have 7    the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall 8    promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to 9    the administrator of the coordinated licensure information 10    system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure 11    information system shall promptly notify the new home 12    state of any such actions.13        4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 14    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 15    of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. 16    Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for 17    the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the 18    production of evidence from another party state shall be 19    enforced in the latter state by any court of competent 20    jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of 21    that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings 22    pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any 23    witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees 24    required by the service statutes of the state in which the 25    witnesses or evidence are located.26        5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure   SB0102- 13 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based 2    information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 3    criminal background checks, receive the results of the 4    Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal 5    background checks and use the results in making licensure 6    decisions.7        6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from 8    the affected nurse the costs of investigations and 9    disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action 10    taken against that nurse.11        7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings 12    of the remote state, provided that the licensing board 13    follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.14    b. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a 15nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure 16privilege to practice in all other party states shall be 17deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the 18multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that 19impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license 20shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate 21licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during 22the pendency of the order.23    c. Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state's 24decision that participation in an alternative program may be 25used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board 26shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the   SB0102- 14 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the 2nurse's participation in an alternative program.  3ARTICLE VI 4Coordinated Licensure Information System and Exchange of 5Information 6    a. All party states shall participate in a coordinated 7licensure information system of all licensed registered nurses 8(RNs) and licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). 9This system will include information on the licensure and 10disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party 11states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and 12enforcement efforts.13    b. The Commission, in consultation with the administrator 14of the coordinated licensure information system, shall 15formulate necessary and proper procedures for the 16identification, collection and exchange of information under 17this Compact.18    c. All licensing boards shall promptly report to the 19coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, 20any current significant investigative information, denials of 21applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse 22participation in alternative programs known to the licensing 23board regardless of whether such participation is deemed 24nonpublic or confidential under state law.  SB0102- 15 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    d. Current significant investigative information and 2participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative 3programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated 4licensure information system only to party state licensing 5boards.6    e. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party 7state licensing boards contributing information to the 8coordinated licensure information system may designate 9information that may not be shared with non-party states or 10disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express 11permission of the contributing state.12    f. Any personally identifiable information obtained from 13the coordinated licensure information system by a party state 14licensing board shall not be shared with non-party states or 15disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the 16extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing 17the information.18    g. Any information contributed to the coordinated 19licensure information system that is subsequently required to 20be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that 21information shall also be expunged from the coordinated 22licensure information system.23    h. The Compact administrator of each party state shall 24furnish a uniform data set to the Compact administrator of 25each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:26        1. Identifying information;  SB0102- 16 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        2. Licensure data;2        3. Information related to alternative program 3    participation; and4        4. Other information that may facilitate the 5    administration of this Compact, as determined by 6    Commission rules.7    i. The Compact administrator of a party state shall 8provide all investigative documents and information requested 9by another party state.  10ARTICLE VII 11Establishment of the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure 12Compact Administrators 13    a. The party states hereby create and establish a joint 14public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse 15Licensure Compact Administrators.16        1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party 17    states.18        2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or 19    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 20    exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where 21    the principal office of the Commission is located. The 22    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 23    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in 24    alternative dispute resolution proceedings.  SB0102- 17 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 2    waiver of sovereign immunity.3    b. Membership, Voting and Meetings4        1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one 5    administrator. The head of the state licensing board or 6    designee shall be the administrator of this Compact for 7    each party state. Any administrator may be removed or 8    suspended from office as provided by the law of the state 9    from which the Administrator is appointed. Any vacancy 10    occurring in the Commission shall be filled in accordance 11    with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy 12    exists.13        2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) 14    vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation 15    of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to 16    participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. 17    An administrator shall vote in person or by such other 18    means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide 19    for an administrator's participation in meetings by 20    telephone or other means of communication.21        3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 22    calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set 23    forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission.24        4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and 25    public notice of meetings shall be given in the same 26    manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in   SB0102- 18 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    Article VIII.2        5. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic 3    meeting if the Commission must discuss:4            i. Noncompliance of a party state with its 5        obligations under this Compact;6            ii. The employment, compensation, discipline or 7        other personnel matters, practices or procedures 8        related to specific employees or other matters related 9        to the Commission's internal personnel practices and 10        procedures;11            iii. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated 12        litigation;13            iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or 14        sale of goods, services or real estate;15            v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 16        censuring any person;17            vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or 18        financial information that is privileged or 19        confidential;20            vii. Disclosure of information of a personal 21        nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly 22        unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;23            viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled 24        for law enforcement purposes;25            ix. Disclosure of information related to any 26        reports prepared by or on behalf of the Commission for   SB0102- 19 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        the purpose of investigation of compliance with this 2        Compact; or3            x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 4        by federal or state statute.5        6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 6    pursuant to this provision, the Commission's legal counsel 7    or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed 8    and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The 9    Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly 10    describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall 11    provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and 12    the reasons therefor, including a description of the views 13    expressed. All documents considered in connection with an 14    action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes 15    and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, 16    subject to release by a majority vote of the Commission or 17    order of a court of competent jurisdiction.18    c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the 19administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its 20conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the 21purposes and exercise the powers of this Compact, including 22but not limited to:23        1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;24        2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:25            i. For the establishment and meetings of other 26        committees; and  SB0102- 20 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1            ii. Governing any general or specific delegation 2        of any authority or function of the Commission;3        3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and 4    conducting meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable 5    advance notice of all meetings and providing an 6    opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested 7    parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect 8    the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and 9    proprietary information, including trade secrets. The 10    Commission may meet in closed session only after a 11    majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in 12    whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the Commission 13    must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting 14    revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy 15    votes allowed;16        4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and 17    reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of 18    the Commission;19        5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for 20    the establishment of the personnel policies and programs 21    of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or 22    other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall 23    exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of 24    the Commission; and25        6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations 26    of the Commission and the equitable disposition of any   SB0102- 21 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this 2    Compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts 3    and obligations;4    d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and 5any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of 6the Commission.7    e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in 8accordance with the bylaws.9    f. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are 10consistent with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.11    g. The Commission shall have the following powers:12        1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and 13    coordinate implementation and administration of this 14    Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law 15    and shall be binding in all party states;16        2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions 17    in the name of the Commission, provided that the standing 18    of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable 19    law shall not be affected;20        3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;21        4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of 22    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 23    party state or nonprofit organizations;24        5. To cooperate with other organizations that 25    administer state compacts related to the regulation of 26    nursing, including but not limited to sharing   SB0102- 22 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    administrative or staff expenses, office space or other 2    resources;3        6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 4    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 5    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this 6    Compact, and to establish the Commission's personnel 7    policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 8    qualifications of personnel and other related personnel 9    matters;10        7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants 11    and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and 12    services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; 13    provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 14    appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;15        8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 16    donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, 17    any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided 18    that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 19    appearance of impropriety;20        9. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 21    abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether 22    real, personal or mixed;23        10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;24        11. To borrow money;25        12. To appoint committees, including advisory 26    committees comprised of administrators, state nursing   SB0102- 23 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    regulators, state legislators or their representatives, 2    and consumer representatives, and other such interested 3    persons;4        13. To provide and receive information from, and to 5    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;6        14. To adopt and use an official seal; and7        15. To perform such other functions as may be 8    necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this 9    Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse 10    licensure and practice.11    h. Financing of the Commission12        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 13    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 14    organization and ongoing activities.15        2. The Commission may also levy on and collect an 16    annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost 17    of its operations, activities and staff in its annual 18    budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual 19    assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a 20    formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall 21    promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states.22        3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 23    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 24    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of 25    the party states, except by, and with the authority of, 26    such party state.  SB0102- 24 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 2    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 3    of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and 4    accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 5    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 6    by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified 7    or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit 8    shall be included in and become part of the annual report 9    of the Commission.10    i. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification11        1. The administrators, officers, executive director, 12    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 13    immune from suit and liability, either personally or in 14    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 15    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 16    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 17    alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the 18    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 19    basis for believing occurred, within the scope of 20    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 21    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 22    to protect any such person from suit or liability for any 23    damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the 24    intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person.25        2. The Commission shall defend any administrator, 26    officer, executive director, employee or representative of   SB0102- 25 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose 2    liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error 3    or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 4    employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person 5    against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for 6    believing occurred within the scope of Commission 7    employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that 8    nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person 9    from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided 10    further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission 11    did not result from that person's intentional, willful or 12    wanton misconduct.13        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 14    any administrator, officer, executive director, employee 15    or representative of the Commission for the amount of any 16    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 17    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or 18    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 19    employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such 20    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 21    within the scope of Commission employment, duties or 22    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 23    error or omission did not result from the intentional, 24    willful or wanton misconduct of that person.  25ARTICLE VIII SB0102- 26 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1Rulemaking 2    a. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 3pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Article and the 4rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become 5binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and 6shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this 7Compact.8    b. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a 9regular or special meeting of the Commission.10    c. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or 11rules by the Commission, and at least sixty (60) days in 12advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and 13voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed 14rulemaking:15        1. On the website of the Commission; and16        2. On the website of each licensing board or the 17    publication in which each state would otherwise publish 18    proposed rules.19    d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:20        1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting 21    in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;22        2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the 23    reason for the proposed rule;24        3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from 25    any interested person; and  SB0102- 27 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        4. The manner in which interested persons may submit 2    notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the 3    public hearing and any written comments.4    e. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission 5shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions 6and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.7    f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public 8hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.9    g. The Commission shall publish the place, time and date 10of the scheduled public hearing.11        1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing 12    each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable 13    opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings 14    will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon 15    request.16        2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as 17    requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be 18    grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings 19    required by this section.20    h. If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission 21may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.22    i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 23of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was 24not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral 25comments received.26    j. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all   SB0102- 28 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and 2shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based 3on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.4    k. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 5Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without 6prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided 7that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact 8and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule 9as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 10(90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the 11purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must 12be adopted immediately in order to:13        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or 14    welfare;15        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; 16    or17        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an 18    administrative rule that is required by federal law or 19    rule.20    l. The Commission may direct revisions to a previously 21adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting 22typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency 23or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be 24posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be 25subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) 26days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on   SB0102- 29 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1grounds that the revision results in a material change to a 2rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to 3the Commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no 4challenge is made, the revision will take effect without 5further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision 6may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.  7ARTICLE IX 8Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement 9    a. Oversight10        1. Each party state shall enforce this Compact and 11    take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate 12    this Compact's purposes and intent.13        2. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 14    of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, 15    responsibilities or actions of the Commission, and shall 16    have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all 17    purposes. Failure to provide service of process in such 18    proceeding to the Commission shall render a judgment or 19    order void as to the Commission, this Compact or 20    promulgated rules.21    b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination22        1. If the Commission determines that a party state has 23    defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 24    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated   SB0102- 30 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    rules, the Commission shall:2            i. Provide written notice to the defaulting state 3        and other party states of the nature of the default, 4        the proposed means of curing the default or any other 5        action to be taken by the Commission; and6            ii. Provide remedial training and specific 7        technical assistance regarding the default.8        2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the 9    defaulting state's membership in this Compact may be 10    terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the 11    administrators, and all rights, privileges and benefits 12    conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the 13    effective date of termination. A cure of the default does 14    not relieve the offending state of obligations or 15    liabilities incurred during the period of default.16        3. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be 17    imposed only after all other means of securing compliance 18    have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or 19    terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor 20    of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of 21    the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the 22    party states.23        4. A state whose membership in this Compact has been 24    terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations 25    and liabilities incurred through the effective date of 26    termination, including obligations that extend beyond the   SB0102- 31 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    effective date of termination.2        5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to 3    a state that is found to be in default or whose membership 4    in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in 5    writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.6        6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the 7    Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the 8    District of Columbia or the federal district in which the 9    Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party 10    shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including 11    reasonable attorneys' fees.12    c. Dispute Resolution13        1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall 14    attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that 15    arise among party states and between party and non-party 16    states.17        2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing 18    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 19    disputes, as appropriate.20        3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes 21    among party states arising under this Compact:22            i. The party states may submit the issues in 23        dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be 24        comprised of individuals appointed by the Compact 25        administrator in each of the affected party states and 26        an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact   SB0102- 32 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1        administrators of all the party states involved in the 2        dispute.3            ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators 4        shall be final and binding.5    d. Enforcement6        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 7    discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this 8    Compact.9        2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal 10    action in the U.S. District Court for the District of 11    Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission 12    has its principal offices against a party state that is in 13    default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this 14    Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief 15    sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In 16    the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the 17    prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such 18    litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.19        3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive 20    remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any 21    other remedies available under federal or state law.  22ARTICLE X 23Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment 24    a. This Compact shall become effective and binding on the   SB0102- 33 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this Compact 2into law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or December 31, 32018. All party states to this Compact, that also were parties 4to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this 5Compact, ("Prior Compact"), shall be deemed to have withdrawn 6from said Prior Compact within six (6) months after the 7effective date of this Compact.8    b. Each party state to this Compact shall continue to 9recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice 10in that party state issued under the Prior Compact until such 11party state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.12    c. Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by 13enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state's 14withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after 15enactment of the repealing statute.16    d. A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not 17affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or 18terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions 19and significant investigations occurring prior to the 20effective date of such withdrawal or termination.21    e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 22invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other 23cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-party 24state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of 25this Compact.26    f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No   SB0102- 34 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 2upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the 3laws of all party states.4    g. Representatives of non-party states to this Compact 5shall be invited to participate in the activities of the 6Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of 7this Compact by all states.  8ARTICLE XI 9Construction and Severability 10This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate 11the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be 12severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of 13this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of 14any party state or of the United States, or if the 15applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 16circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of 17this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, 18agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. 19If this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the 20constitution of any party state, this Compact shall remain in 21full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in 22full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all 23severable matters.    SB0102- 35 -LRB104 06390 AAS 16426 b1    (225 ILCS 65/85-10 new)2    Sec. 85-10. State labor laws. The Nurse Licensure Compact 3does not supersede existing State labor laws. 4    (225 ILCS 65/85-15 new)5    Sec. 85-15. Criminal history record checks. The State may 6not share with or disclose to the Interstate Commission of 7Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators or any other state any 8of the contents of a nationwide criminal history records check 9conducted for the purpose of multistate licensure under the 10Nurse Licensure Compact.